trunk/incubator/apertium-hi.hi.dix
    <pardef n="क्/अर__व्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरूँ</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरे</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरिए</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ईजिये</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरे</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरें</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरो</l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरें</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अरिए</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ईजिये</l>
          <r>अर<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="थ्/आ__व्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>आ</l>
          <r>था<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:WA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r>था<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:WA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ई</l>
          <r>था<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:WA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ईं</l>
          <r>था<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:WA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/जा__व्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>गया</l>
          <r>जा<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>गये</l>
          <r>जा<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>गयी</l>
          <r>जा<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>गई</l>
          <r>जा<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>गयीं</l>
          <r>जा<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>गईं</l>
          <r>जा<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="रात्/अ__न्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अ</l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>एं</l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अ</l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="भीड/__न्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="आशा/__न्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>यें</l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>एँ</l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="गुडिय्/आ__न्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>आ</l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>आँ</l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>आ</l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ईर्ष्या/__न्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="आपत्ति/__न्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>याँ</l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>यों</l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="शान्ति/__न्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>आ<s n="cat:n"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="अंगरक्षा"><i>अंगरक्षा</i><par n="ईर्ष्या/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="अनवस्थिति"><i>अनवस्थिति</i><par n="शान्ति/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="अरुचि"><i>अरुचि</i><par n="शान्ति/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="असंभावना"><i>असंभावना</i><par n="आशा/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="असमिया"><i>असमिया</i><par n="ईर्ष्या/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="असि"><i>असि</i><par n="आपत्ति/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="आत्मजय"><i>आत्मजय</i><par n="भीड/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="अयुक्ति"><i>अयुक्ति</i><par n="शान्ति/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="अँधेरिया"><i>अँधेरिया</i><par n="ईर्ष्या/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="बछिया"><i>बछिय्</i><par n="गुडिय्/आ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="बर्फ"><i>बर्फ्</i><par n="रात्/अ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="भावभंगिमा"><i>भावभंगिमा</i><par n="आशा/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="भेंट"><i>भेंट</i><par n="भीड/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="बिटिआ"><i>बिटि</i><par n="गुडिय्/आ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="ब्रह्मग्रंथि"><i>ब्रह्मग्रंथि</i><par n="आपत्ति/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="बुडिया"><i>बुडिय्</i><par n="गुडिय्/आ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="छाँह"><i>छाँह</i><par n="भीड/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="चिडिया"><i>चिडिय्</i><par n="गुडिय्/आ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="चील"><i>चील्</i><par n="रात्/अ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="चित्रोक्ति"><i>चित्रोक्ति</i><par n="शान्ति/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="डिबिया"><i>डिबिय्</i><par n="गुडिय्/आ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="गणित"><i>गणित</i><par n="भीड/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="गोपालिका"><i>गोपालिका</i><par n="आशा/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="गुडिया"><i>गुडिय्</i><par n="गुडिय्/आ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="घुरघुराहट"><i>घुरघुराहट्</i><par n="रात्/अ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="हंडिया"><i>हंडिय्</i><par n="गुडिय्/आ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="हरीतिमा"><i>हरीतिमा</i><par n="ईर्ष्या/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="हाट"><i>हाट</i><par n="भीड/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="जा"><i></i><par n="/जा__व्"/></e>
    <e lm="झिलमिल"><i>झिलमिल</i><par n="भीड/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="जीप"><i>जीप्</i><par n="रात्/अ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="कल्पनाशक्ति"><i>कल्पनाशक्ति</i><par n="शान्ति/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="कामकला"><i>कामकला</i><par n="आशा/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="क्लिप"><i>क्लिप्</i><par n="रात्/अ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="कोपलता"><i>कोपलता</i><par n="ईर्ष्या/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="कोठरिया"><i>कोठरिय्</i><par n="गुडिय्/आ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="लय"><i>लय</i><par n="भीड/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="लेखपद्धति"><i>लेखपद्धति</i><par n="आपत्ति/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="लेखापुस्तिका"><i>लेखापुस्तिका</i><par n="आशा/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="लुटिया"><i>लुटिय्</i><par n="गुडिय्/आ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="महफिल"><i>महफिल्</i><par n="रात्/अ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="महारात्रि"><i>महारात्रि</i><par n="शान्ति/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="माया"><i>माया</i><par n="ईर्ष्या/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="मायाविता"><i>मायाविता</i><par n="आशा/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="नकल"><i>नकल्</i><par n="रात्/अ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="नवजागर्ति"><i>नवजागर्ति</i><par n="शान्ति/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="नति"><i>नति</i><par n="आपत्ति/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="नदिया"><i>नदिय्</i><par n="गुडिय्/आ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="पक्वता"><i>पक्वता</i><par n="ईर्ष्या/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="परिधि"><i>परिधि</i><par n="आपत्ति/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="फटकार"><i>फटकार</i><par n="भीड/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="फिल्म"><i>फिल्म्</i><par n="रात्/अ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रमुखसभा"><i>प्रमुखसभा</i><par n="आशा/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रतिरक्षा"><i>प्रतिरक्षा</i><par n="ईर्ष्या/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रतिश्रुति"><i>प्रतिश्रुति</i><par n="आपत्ति/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रेतशुद्धि"><i>प्रेतशुद्धि</i><par n="शान्ति/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="सहोक्ति"><i>सहोक्ति</i><par n="आपत्ति/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="सन्निधि"><i>सन्निधि</i><par n="आपत्ति/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="शारिका"><i>शारिका</i><par n="आशा/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="शर्म"><i>शर्म</i><par n="भीड/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="सदस्यता"><i>सदस्यता</i><par n="ईर्ष्या/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="सौत"><i>सौत्</i><par n="रात्/अ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="श्रुतिकीर्ति"><i>श्रुतिकीर्ति</i><par n="शान्ति/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="सूचि"><i>सूचि</i><par n="आपत्ति/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="वारित्रा"><i>वारित्रा</i><par n="आशा/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="विभक्ति"><i>विभक्ति</i><par n="आपत्ति/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="विजानता"><i>विजानता</i><par n="ईर्ष्या/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="था"><i>थ्</i><par n="थ्/आ__व्"/></e>
    <e lm="तमीज"><i>तमीज</i><par n="भीड/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="दुकान"><i>दुकान्</i><par n="रात्/अ__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="दुष्कीर्ति"><i>दुष्कीर्ति</i><par n="शान्ति/__न्"/></e>
    <e lm="यातना"><i>यातना</i><par n="आशा/__न्"/></e>
